Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.070

License renewals.

The secretary shall establish by rule the requirements and fees for renewal of a license. Failure to renew the license invalidates the license and all privileges granted by the license. If a license has lapsed for a period longer than three years, the person shall demonstrate competence to the satisfaction of the secretary by completing continuing competency requirements or meeting other standards determined by the secretary.

[ 2009 c 302 s 8.]